Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1089.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Safer Sealant Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Environmental Protection of the Commonwealth."Fund." The Safer Sealant Fund established under section 5(a).123456789101112131415161718 "High-PAH sealant." A sealant product containing more than 0.1% polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbons by weight."Municipality." A county, city, borough, incorporated town or township.Section 3. Restrictions on use of high-PAH sealants.(a) Prohibitions.--(1) A person may not supply, sell or offer for sale a high-PAH sealant for application on a driveway or parking area after December 31, 2025.(2) A person may not apply or solicit the application of a high-PAH sealant to a driveway or parking area after December 31, 2026.(b) Civil penalty.--A person violating subsection (a) shall be subject to a civil penalty not exceeding $2,500 for each violation.Section 4. Municipal ordinances.(a) Authorization.--A municipality may enact an ordinance that provides:(1) A person may not supply, sell or offer for sale a high-PAH sealant for application on a driveway or parking area in the municipality.(2) A person may not apply or solicit the application of a high-PAH sealant to a driveway or parking area in the municipality.(b) Construction.--Nothing in this act shall be construed to:(1) prohibit a municipality from enacting an ordinance that is more stringent than the ordinance authorized under subsection (a); or(2) affect an ordinance enacted by a municipality prior 20250HB1089PN1206 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to the effective date of this section that is at least as stringent as the ordinance authorized under subsection (a).(c) Collection of civil penalties.--A municipality enforcing an ordinance under this section may collect and use a civil penalty the amount of which may be determined by the municipality.(d) Model ordinance.--The department shall draft a model ordinance that municipalities may use under this section.Section 5. Fund.(a) Establishment.--The Safer Sealant Fund is established within the State Treasury which, along with interest earned, shall be used by the department to further the purposes of this act.(b) Deposits.--Civil penalties collected by the department under section 3 shall be deposited into the fund.Section 6. Administration.(a) Enforcement.--The department shall enforce the provisions of section 3.(b) Rules and regulations.--The Environmental Quality Board may adopt or promulgate any rules or regulations necessary for the administration of this act, including the use and disbursement of money from the fund.Section 7. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1089PN1206 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324